Illinois, session 104th, HB3130.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 22-80 and by adding Section 22-77 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/22-77 new)7    Sec. 22-77. Payment of surplus to the previous owner.8    (a) This Section applies to tax deeds issued with respect 9to residential property sold under this Code on or after the 10effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 11Assembly. 12    (b) Within 30 days after recording of the tax deed, the tax 13deed grantee shall pay the surplus to the previous owner of the 14property described in the deed. For the purposes of this 15Section, the surplus shall be calculated as follows: 16        (1) If the property has been sold since recording of 17    the deed, the surplus shall be equal to the amount 18    received from the sale, minus (i) the amount that would 19    have been needed to redeem the property; (ii) the amount 20    needed to pay all encumbrances on the property; and (iii) 21    an administrative fee of $500, which may be retained by 22    the grantee to offset the costs incurred in obtaining the 23    deed.   HB3130- 2 -LRB104 10839 HLH 20920 b1        (2) If the property has not been sold since recording 2    of the deed, the surplus shall be equal to the fair market 3    value of the property on the date the tax deed was issued, 4    as determined by the chief county assessment officer, 5    minus (i) the amount that would have been needed to redeem 6    the property; (ii) the amount needed to pay all 7    encumbrances on the property; and (iii) an administrative 8    fee of $500, which may be retained by the grantee to offset 9    the costs incurred in obtaining the deed. 10    (c) Any civil action or proceeding to enforce the 11provisions of this Section against any person may be 12instituted in the circuit court for the county in which the 13property is located.  14    (35 ILCS 200/22-80)15    Sec. 22-80. Order of court setting aside tax deed; 16payments to holder of deed.17    (a) Any order of court vacating an order directing the 18county clerk to issue a tax deed based upon a finding that the 19property was not subject to taxation or special assessment, or 20that the taxes or special assessments had been paid prior to 21the sale of the property, or that the tax sale was otherwise 22void, shall declare the tax sale to be a sale in error pursuant 23to Section 21-310 of this Act. The order shall direct the 24county collector to refund to the tax deed grantee or his or 25her successors and assigns (or, if a tax deed has not yet   HB3130- 3 -LRB104 10839 HLH 20920 b1issued, the holder of the certificate) the following amounts: 2        (1) all taxes and special assessments purchased, paid, 3    or redeemed by the tax purchaser or his or her assignee, or 4    by the tax deed grantee or his or her successors and 5    assigns, whether before or after entry of the order for 6    tax deed, with interest at the rate of 1% per month from 7    the date each amount was paid until the date of payment 8    pursuant to this Section; 9        (2) all costs paid and posted to the judgment record 10    and not included in paragraph (1) of this subsection (a); 11    and 12        (3) court reporter fees for the hearing on the 13    application for tax deed and transcript thereof, cost of 14    certification of tax deed order, cost of issuance of tax 15    deed, and cost of recording of tax deed; and .16        (4) any surplus paid by the tax deed grantee or tax 17    purchaser under Section 22-77. 18    (b) Except in those cases described in subsection (a) of 19this Section, and unless the court on motion of the tax deed 20petitioner extends the redemption period to a date not later 21than 3 years from the date of sale, any order of court finding 22that an order directing the county clerk to issue a tax deed 23should be vacated shall direct the party who successfully 24contested the entry of the order to pay to the tax deed grantee 25or his or her successors and assigns (or, if a tax deed has not 26yet issued, the holder of the certificate) within 90 days   HB3130- 4 -LRB104 10839 HLH 20920 b1after the date of the finding: 2        (1) the amount necessary to redeem the property from 3    the sale as of the last day of the period of redemption, 4    except that, if the sale is a scavenger sale pursuant to 5    Section 21-260 of this Act, the redemption amount shall 6    not include an amount equal to all delinquent taxes on 7    such property which taxes were delinquent at the time of 8    sale; and 9        (2) amounts in satisfaction of municipal liens paid by 10    the tax purchaser or his or her assignee, and the amounts 11    specified in paragraphs (1) and (3) of subsection (a) of 12    this Section, to the extent the amounts are not included 13    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (b).14    If the payment is not made within the 90-day period, the 15petition to vacate the order directing the county clerk to 16issue a tax deed shall be denied with prejudice, and the order 17directing the county clerk to issue a tax deed shall remain in 18full force and effect. No final order vacating any order 19directing the county clerk to issue a tax deed shall be entered 20pursuant to this subsection (b) until the payment has been 21made.22(Source: P.A. 91-357, eff. 7-29-99.)